trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="duel__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/og__n"> <!-- Common; ~og / ~ogen / ~øger / ~øgerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øger</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgerne</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paryk__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ken / ~ker / ~kerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pik__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ken / ~ke / ~kene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ånd__n"> <!-- Common; ~ånd / ~ånden / ~ænder / ~ænderne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånd</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånden</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="æg__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~get / ~ / ~gene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>get</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mis__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~sen / ~ser / ~serne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ser</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fængs/el__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let | (~elet) / ~ler / ~lerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sed/del__n"> <!-- ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>del</l>
          <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="øl__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~ | (~ler) / ~lene | (~lerne) -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="æg"><i>æg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bog"><i>b</i><par n="b/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duel"><i>duel</i><par n="duel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fængsel"><i>fængs</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hånd"><i>h</i><par n="h/ånd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mis"><i>mis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øl"><i>øl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pik"><i>pik</i><par n="pik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prik"><i>prik</i><par n="paryk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seddel"><i>sed</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paryk"><i>paryk</i><par n="paryk__n"/></e>
